Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202542-1411
Evaluation.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall conduct an annual evaluation of the Family Resource and Juvenile Assessment Center Pilot Program's impact on youth and family well-being, community trust, and reduction in juvenile justice system involvement to inform future program developments under sections 42-1401 to 42-1411.

Laws 2025, LB48, § 11.